Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.84.010

Criminal mischief.

(1) A person is guilty of the crime of criminal mischief if, acting with three or more other persons, he or she knowingly and unlawfully uses or threatens to use force, or in any way participates in the use of such force, against any other person or against property.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, the crime of criminal mischief is a gross misdemeanor.

(b) The crime of criminal mischief is a class C felony if the actor is armed with a deadly weapon.

[ 2013 c 20 s 1; 2003 c 53 s 91; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.84.010.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 20: "This act takes effect January 1, 2014." [ 2013 c 20 s 3.]

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.